Georgia, session 2025_26, HB184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
12 SECTION 1.
13 Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to motor vehicles and traffic, is
14 amended in Chapter 11, relating to abandoned, derelict, and civil forfeiture of motor vehicles,
15 by adding a new article to read as follows:
H. B. 184
- 1 -

25 LC 52 0652
16 "ARTICLE 3
17 40-11-30.
18 This article shall be known and may be cited as the 'Georgia Consumer Protection Towing
19 Act.'
20 40-11-31.
21 The purpose of this article is to establish minimum standards for towing services and to
22 promote fair and honest practices in the towing service business.
23 40-11-32.
24 As used in this article, the term:
25 (1) 'Automobile club services' shall have the same meaning as provided in Code
26 Section 33-61-1.
27 (2) 'Department' means the Department of Public Safety.
28 (3) 'Emergency towing' means the towing of a vehicle due to an accident, mechanical
29 breakdown on a public roadway, or other emergency related incident necessitating
30 vehicle removal for public safety with or without the owner's consent.
31 (4) 'Government agency towing' means the towing of government owned or government
32 controlled vehicles by the government agency that owns or controls such vehicles.
33 (5) 'Law enforcement towing' means the towing of a vehicle for law enforcement
34 purposes other than seizure towing. The term includes towing for law enforcement
35 purposes that is performed by a towing company under a contract with or on behalf of the
36 state or a local unit or a law enforcement agency of the state or local unit.
37 (6) 'Owner' means the registered owner, the owner as recorded on the title, the lessor, the
38 lessee, any security interest holders, and all lienholders as shown on the records of the
39 Department of Revenue or the records from the vehicle's state of registration. For
H. B. 184
- 2 -

25 LC 52 0652
40 purposes of this article, a rental vehicle company is the owner of a motor vehicle rented
41 pursuant to a rental agreement.
42 (7) 'Owner requested towing' means the request to tow a vehicle by or on behalf of the
43 vehicle owner or operator.
44 (8) 'Private property towing' means the towing of a vehicle without the owner's consent
45 from private property on which such vehicle was illegally parked or for which some
46 exigent circumstance necessitated its removal to another location.
47 (9) 'Seizure towing' means the towing of a vehicle for law enforcement purposes
48 involving the maintenance of the chain of custody of evidence or forfeiture of assets.
49 (10) 'Storage facility' means any lot, facility, or other property used to store vehicles that
50 have been removed from another location by a tow truck. Such term includes a storage
51 firm or a storage yard.
52 (11) 'Towing company' means any service, company, or business that tows or otherwise
53 moves vehicles by means of a tow truck or owns or operates a storage facility for towed
54 vehicles. Such term shall include a towing firm. Such term shall not include an
55 automobile club, car dealership, or insurance company.
56 (12) 'Towing service' means the towing, moving, or unloading of an abandoned,
57 disabled, or improperly parked vehicle. Such term shall include a flatbed service or
58 rollback service in which a towing company moves vehicles by loading them onto a
59 flatbed platform. Such term shall include a recovery service in which a towing company
60 moves a vehicle by the use of a wheel lift device, such as a lift, crane, hoist, winch,
61 cradle, jack, automobile ambulance, tow dolly, or any other similar device.
62 (13) 'Tow truck' means a motor vehicle equipped to provide any form of towing service.
63 (14) 'Tow truck operator' means an individual who operates a tow truck as an employee
64 or agent of a towing company.
H. B. 184
- 3 -

25 LC 52 0652
65 (15) 'Vehicle' or 'motor vehicle' means any vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or
66 semitrailer propelled or drawn by mechanical power and used on the public streets, roads,
67 and highways, as determined by the commissioner of public safety.
68 40-11-33.
69 (a) Except as provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section, the provisions of this
70 article shall be applicable to any entity or person engaging in, or offering to engage in, the
71 business of providing towing service in this state, including but not limited to emergency
72 towing, owner requested towing, private property towing, towing of illegally parked motor
73 vehicles in parking places designated for persons with disabilities, in violation of Code
74 Section 40-6-226, and nonconsensual towing services on private property and in
75 municipalities, as provided for in Code Section 44-1-13.
76 (b) The provisions of this article shall not apply to:
77 (1) Motor vehicles towed into or through the state if the tow originates in another
78 jurisdiction;
79 (2) The towing of motor vehicles by or on behalf of an automobile club, car dealership,
80 or insurance company;
81 (3) Government agency towing or seizure towing; or
82 (4) The towing of abandoned, derelict, or contraband motor vehicles, as provided for in
83 Articles 1, 1A, and 2 of this chapter.
84 (c) The provisions of this article confer exclusive regulatory jurisdiction to the department
85 over the towing services and related storage services of towing companies and storage
86 facilities. The department shall establish a complaint procedure for consumers and insurers
87 regarding violations of provisions in this article.
H. B. 184
- 4 -

25 LC 52 0652
88 40-11-34.
89 (a) This Code section applies to a towing company that engages in or offers to engage in
90 emergency towing. Prior to removing a vehicle from a tow truck under this Code section,
91 a towing company shall take photographs, video, or other visual documentation to evidence
92 the vehicle damages, debris, damaged cargo or property, and complications to recovery
93 process.
94 (b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, a towing company shall not
95 stop or cause a person to stop at the scene of an accident or near a disabled motor vehicle:
96 (1) If there is an injury as the result of an accident; or
97 (2) For the purpose of:
98 (A) Soliciting an engagement for emergency towing services;
99 (B) Moving a motor vehicle from a public street, road, or highway; or
100 (C) Accruing charges in connection with an activity in subparagraph (A) or (B) of this
101 paragraph.
102 (c) A towing company may stop or cause a person to stop at the scene of an accident or
103 near a disabled motor vehicle under the circumstances, or for any of the purposes,
104 described in subsection (b) of this Code section if:
105 (1) The towing company is requested to stop or to perform a towing service by a law
106 enforcement officer or by authorized state, county, or municipal personnel;
107 (2) The towing company is summoned to the scene or requested to stop by the owner or
108 operator of a disabled vehicle;
109 (3) The owner of a disabled motor vehicle has previously provided consent to the towing
110 company to stop or perform a towing service; or
111 (4) The towing company has reasonable belief that a motorist is in need of immediate
112 aid. The towing company may not offer towing services in this circumstance unless the
113 conditions provided for in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection are met.
H. B. 184
- 5 -

25 LC 52 0652
114 (d) Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f) of this Code section, the owner or
115 operator of a disabled motor vehicle may:
116 (1) Summon to the disabled motor vehicle's location the towing company of the owner's
117 or operator's choice, either directly or through an insurance company's or an automobile
118 club's emergency service arrangement; and
119 (2) Designate the location to which the disabled motor vehicle is to be towed; provided,
120 however, that, if the location designated by the owner or operator is not a storage facility
121 owned or operated by the towing company, the owner or operator shall make
122 arrangements for payment to the towing company at the time the towing company is
123 summoned.
124 (e) Subsection (d) of this Code section shall not apply:
125 (1) In any case in which the owner or operator of a disabled motor vehicle:
126 (A) Is incapacitated or otherwise unable to summon a towing company; or
127 (B) Defers to law enforcement or to authorized state, county, or municipal personnel
128 as to the towing company to be summoned or the location to which the disabled motor
129 vehicle is to be towed; or
130 (2) In the event of a state of emergency or disaster declared by the Governor;
131 (f) The authority of an owner or operator of a disabled vehicle to summon the towing
132 company of the owner's or operator's choice under subsection (d) of this Code section shall
133 be superseded by a law enforcement officer or by authorized state, county, or municipal
134 personnel if the towing company of choice of the owner or operator:
135 (1) Is unable to respond to the location of the disabled motor vehicle in a timely fashion;
136 and
137 (2) The disabled motor vehicle is a hazard, impedes the flow of traffic, or may not
138 legally remain in its location in the opinion of the law enforcement officer or authorized
139 state, county, or municipal personnel.
H. B. 184
- 6 -

25 LC 52 0652
140 (g) If a disabled motor vehicle is causing or posing a safety hazard, the disabled motor
141 vehicle may be moved by a towing company to a safe location after being released by a law
142 enforcement officer or by authorized state, county, or municipal personnel for that purpose.
143 (h) If a towing company is summoned for emergency towing by the owner or operator of
144 a disabled motor vehicle, the towing company shall make a record, to the extent available,
145 consisting of:
146 (1) The first and last name and telephone number of the person who summoned the
147 towing company to the scene; and
148 (2) The make, model, year, vehicle identification number, and license plate number of
149 the disabled motor vehicle.
150 (i) If a towing company is summoned for emergency towing by a law enforcement officer
151 or by authorized state, county, or municipal personnel, the towing company shall make a
152 record, to the extent available, consisting of:
153 (1) The identity of the law enforcement agency or authorized state, county, or municipal
154 agency requesting the emergency towing; and
155 (2) The make, model, year, vehicle identification number, and license plate number of
156 the disabled motor vehicle.
157 (j) A towing company shall retain a record created under subsections (h) and (i) of this
158 Code section and shall:
159 (1) Provide such record to a law enforcement agency upon request from the time the
160 towing company appears at the scene of the disabled motor vehicle until the time the
161 motor vehicle is towed and released to an authorized third party; and
162 (2) Make such record available for inspection and copying not later than two business
163 days after receiving a written request from a law enforcement agency, the Attorney
164 General, the disabled motor vehicle's owner, or an authorized agent of the disabled motor
165 vehicle's owner for a period of two years from the date the disabled vehicle is towed from
166 the scene.
H. B. 184
- 7 -

25 LC 52 0652
167 (k) A towing company that performs emergency towing under this Code section shall
168 properly secure all towed motor vehicles and take all reasonable efforts to prevent further
169 damage to such vehicles, including weather damage, or theft of such vehicles, including
170 theft of such vehicles' cargo and contents.
171 40-11-35.
172 (a) This Code section applies to a towing company that engages in or offers to engage in
173 private property towing. This Code section does not apply to the towing of a motor vehicle
174 from a tow-away zone that is not located on private property. Prior to removing a vehicle
175 from a tow truck under this Code section, a towing company shall take photographs, video,
176 or other visual documentation to evidence the vehicle damages, debris, damaged cargo or
177 property, and complications to recovery process.
178 (b) The owner of private property may establish a tow-away zone on the owner's property.
179 A property owner that establishes a tow-away zone under this Code section shall post at
180 the location of the tow-away zone a sign that is clearly visible to the public. The sign shall
181 include a statement that the area is a tow-away zone, pertinent contact information, and a
182 description of any persons authorized to park in the area.
183 (c) A towing company that tows a motor vehicle under this Code section shall ensure that
184 such vehicle is towed to a storage facility that is located within 25 miles of the location of
185 the tow-away zone from which such vehicle was removed or, if there is no such storage
186 facility, to the storage facility closest to the tow-away zone.
187 (d) If the owner or operator of a motor vehicle that is parked in violation of a tow-away
188 zone arrives at the location of the tow-away zone while such vehicle is in the process of
189 being towed, the towing company shall give the owner or operator either oral or written
190 notification that the owner or operator may pay a fee in an amount that is not greater than
191 half of the amount of the fee the towing company normally charges for the release of such
192 vehicle. Upon the payment of the amount specified, the towing company shall release the
H. B. 184
- 8 -

25 LC 52 0652
193 motor vehicle to the owner or operator and give the owner or operator a receipt showing
194 the full amount of the fee the towing company normally charges for the release of a motor
195 vehicle and the amount of the fee paid by the owner or operator.
196 (e) Not later than two hours after completing a tow of a motor vehicle from private
197 property, a towing company shall provide notice of the towing to the law enforcement
198 agency having jurisdiction in the location of the private property.
199 (f) A towing company that performs private property towing under this Code section shall
200 properly secure all towed motor vehicles and take all reasonable efforts to prevent further
201 damage to such vehicles, including weather damage, or theft of such vehicles, including
202 theft of such vehicles' cargo and contents.
203 (g) This Code section shall not affect any private property owner's rights under Articles
204 1 and 1A of this chapter with respect to abandoned or derelict vehicles on such owner's
205 private property.
206 40-11-36.
207 (a) Prior to attaching a motor vehicle to a tow truck, the towing company shall furnish the
208 owner, if the owner is present at the scene, a rate sheet listing all rates for towing services,
209 including but not limited to all rates for towing and associated fees, cleanup charges, labor,
210 storage, and any other services provided by the towing company. A charge in excess of
211 what is reflected on the rate sheet for any service shall be deemed excessive as provided
212 in Code Section 40-11-39. The rate sheet shall also be posted at the towing company's
213 place of business and be made available upon request to consumers.
214 (b) An itemized invoice of actual towing charges assessed by a towing company for a
215 completed tow shall be made available to the owner of the motor vehicle or the owner's
216 authorized agent, which may be an insurance company, not later than one business day
217 after the tow is completed or after the towing company has obtained all necessary
H. B. 184
- 9 -

25 LC 52 0652
218 information to be included on the invoice, including any charges submitted by
219 subcontractors used by the towing company to complete the tow, whichever occurs later.
220 (c) The itemized invoice required by subsection (b) of this Code section shall contain the
221 following information:
222 (1) An invoice number;
223 (2) The location from which the motor vehicle was towed;
224 (3) The location to which the motor vehicle was towed;
225 (4) The name, address, and telephone number of the towing company;
226 (5) A description of the towed motor vehicle, including the make, model, year, vehicle
227 identification number, and color;
228 (6) The license plate number and state of registration for the towed motor vehicle;
229 (7) The cost of the original towing service;
230 (8) The cost of any vehicle storage fees, expressed as a daily rate;
231 (9) Any other reasonable fees; and
232 (10) The costs for services that were performed under a warranty or that were otherwise
233 performed at no cost to the owner of the motor vehicle.
234 (d) Any reasonable service or fee in addition to the services or fees provided for in
235 subsection (c) of this Code section shall be set forth individually as a single line item on
236 the invoice required by this Code section with an explanation and the exact charge for the
237 service or the exact amount of the fee.
238 (e) A copy of each invoice and receipt submitted by a tow truck operator in accordance
239 with this Code section shall be retained by the towing company for a period of two years
240 from the date of issuance. Throughout said two-year period, the copy of each invoice and
241 receipt shall be made available for inspection and copying not later than two business days
242 after receiving a written request for inspection from a law enforcement agency, the
243 Attorney General, the prosecuting attorney or city attorney having jurisdiction in the
H. B. 184
- 10 -

25 LC 52 0652
244 location of any of the towing company's business locations in this state, the owner of the
245 disabled motor vehicle, or the agent of such owner.
246 40-11-37.
247 (a) Within two business days of commencement of towing under this article, the towing
248 company or storage facility shall commence a search of the National Motor Vehicle Title
249 Information System database to obtain the last state of record of the vehicle and then obtain
250 the most current name and address of the person who owns or holds a lien from the state
251 agency responsible for maintaining motor vehicle title data or an authorized vendor
252 providing real-time access to that state database, by electronic means, if available. No
253 storage charges beyond the initial two business days shall accrue until the notice
254 requirement has been met. If a state does not have a mechanism to provide such
255 information electronically, then the towing company shall make all reasonable efforts to
256 obtain the vehicle owner and lienholder information.
257 (b) Upon obtaining the name and address of the owner and lienholder of the motor vehicle,
258 written notice shall be given directly to such owner and lienholder, and, if known to the
259 towing service or storage facility, the insurer of such vehicle, by certified mail with
260 delivery confirmation within three business days unless the ownership information could
261 not reasonably be obtained within that time. Notice to the owner or insurer shall contain
262 the following:
263 (1) The date and time the vehicle was towed;
264 (2) The location from which the vehicle was towed;
265 (3) The name, address, and telephone number where the vehicle will be located;
266 (4) The location, address, and telephone number where payment and business
267 transactions take place, if different from the business address;
268 (5) The name, address, and telephone number of the towing company or storage facility;
H. B. 184
- 11 -

25 LC 52 0652
269 (6) A description of the towed vehicle, including but not limited to the make, model,
270 year, vehicle identification number, and color; and
271 (7) The license plate number and state of registration of the towed vehicle.
272 (c) If the search result under subsection (a) of this Code section is a corporation owned
273 vehicle, then the notice provided in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be sent to the
274 corporation's address in this state as listed on the registration. The vehicle shall be held for
275 up to 60 days in order for the vehicle owner to retrieve the towed vehicle. The rate charged
276 shall be comparable to the standard daily rate. If at any time more than one vehicle owned
277 by the same corporation is under the control of the towing company or storage facility,
278 each vehicle shall be processed as a separate transaction.
279 40-11-38.
280 (a) This Code section applies to towing companies that tow and store motor vehicles and
281 to storage facilities that store motor vehicles towed by a towing company, regardless of
282 whether the towing company and the storage facility are affiliates.
283 (b) Upon payment of all costs incurred against a motor vehicle that is towed and stored
284 under this article, the towing company or storage facility shall release the motor vehicle to:
285 (1) A properly identified person who owns or holds a lien on the motor vehicle; or
286 (2) A representative of the responsible insurance company with proof of such status or
287 proof that the owner of the motor vehicle approves release of the vehicle to such
288 representative.
289 (c) An owner, a lienholder, or an insurance company representative has the right to inspect
290 a motor vehicle during normal business hours before accepting return of the motor vehicle
291 under this Code section.
292 (d) A towing service or storage facility shall accept the following forms of payment from
293 a person seeking to release a motor vehicle under this Code section: cash, insurance check,
294 credit card, debit card, money order, or certified check.
H. B. 184
- 12 -

25 LC 52 0652
295 (e) Upon receiving payment of all costs incurred against a motor vehicle, a towing service
296 or storage facility shall provide to the person making payment an itemized receipt that
297 includes the known or available information provided for in Code Section 40-11-36.
298 (f) A towing service or storage facility shall be open for business and accessible by
299 telephone during normal business hours. A towing service or storage facility shall provide
300 a telephone number that is available on a 24 hour basis to receive calls and messages from
301 callers, including calls made outside of normal business hours. All calls made to a towing
302 service or storage facility shall be returned within 24 hours from the time received.
303 However, if adverse weather, an act of God, an emergency situation, or another act over
304 which the towing service or storage facility has no control prevents such towing service or
305 storage facility from returning calls within 24 hours, the towing service or storage facility
306 shall return all calls received as quickly as possible.
307 40-11-39.
308 (a) A towing company shall not charge a fee for towing, cleanup services, or storage of a
309 vehicle that is excessive or unfairly discriminatory.
310 (b) All services rendered by a towing company, including any warranty or zero-cost
311 services, shall be recorded on an invoice. The towing company or the tow truck operator
312 shall retain the records for two years and shall make such records available for inspection
313 and copying upon written request from law enforcement.
314 (c) A towing company shall furnish a copy of its rate sheet as provided in Code
315 Section 40-11-36 to the department.
316 40-11-40.
317 (a) The department shall approve an application for a towing company certificate or
318 certificate renewal and shall issue or renew a certificate, provided that the applicant
319 submits to the department a completed application on a form prescribed by the department
H. B. 184
- 13 -

25 LC 52 0652
320 and also pays the application fee in an amount to be determined by the commissioner of
321 public safety or as provided for in Code Sections 32-6-28 and 44-1-13.
322 (b) If applicable by state law, any application for a towing company certificate or
323 certificate renewal shall include:
324 (1) The applicant's workers' compensation coverage;
325 (2) The applicant's unemployment compensation coverage; and
326 (3) The financial responsibility of an applicant relating to liability insurance or bond
327 requirements.
328 (c) An applicant shall not have been convicted of fraud or had a civil judgment rendered
329 against it in the past five years, and an officer, director, or partner of an applicant that is a
330 corporation or partnership shall not have been convicted of fraud during such officer's,
331 director's, or partner's tenure.
332 40-11-41.
333 (a) A towing company shall not:
334 (1) Falsely represent, either expressly or by implication, that the towing company
335 represents or is approved by any organization which provides emergency road service for
336 disabled motor vehicles;
337 (2) Require an owner or operator of a disabled vehicle to preauthorize repair work or
338 more than 24 hours of storage as a condition to providing towing service for such
339 disabled vehicle;
340 (3) Charge more than one towing fee when the owner or operator of a disabled vehicle
341 requests transportation of such vehicle to a repair facility owned or operated by the
342 towing company; or
343 (4) Tow a vehicle to a repair facility, unless the owner of such vehicle or the owner's
344 authorized agent gives consent and such consent is given before such vehicle is removed
345 from the location from which it is to be towed; provided, however, that such prohibition
H. B. 184
- 14 -

25 LC 52 0652
346 does not apply to a storage facility that has a repair facility on the same site if the vehicle
347 is not moved into the repair facility without such consent.
348 (b) A towing company or a storage facility shall not:
349 (1) Upon payment of all costs incurred against a motor vehicle that is towed and stored
350 under this article, refuse to release such vehicle to a properly identified person who owns
351 or holds a lien on the motor vehicle or a representative of the responsible insurance
352 company; provided, however, that a towing company or storage facility shall not release
353 a motor vehicle in any case in which a law enforcement agency has ordered the motor
354 vehicle not to be released or in any case in which a judicial order countermands its
355 release;
356 (2) Refuse to permit a properly identified person who owns or holds a lien on a motor
357 vehicle or a representative of the responsible insurance company to inspect the motor
358 vehicle before all costs incurred against the motor vehicle are paid or the motor vehicle
359 is released; or
360 (3) Charge any storage fee for a stored motor vehicle with respect to any day on which
361 release of the motor vehicle or inspection of the motor vehicle by the owner, lienholder,
362 or insurance company is not permitted during normal business hours by the towing
363 company or storage facility.
364 40-11-42.
365 (a) Any person violating the provisions of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
366 The department is authorized to impose a civil penalty for any violation of this article in
367 an amount not to exceed $2,500.00.
368 (b) Any person who suffers injury or damages as a result of a violation of the provisions
369 of this article may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction for actual
370 damages, which shall be presumed to be not less than $100.00, together with court costs.
H. B. 184
- 15 -

25 LC 52 0652
371 A court shall award three times actual damages for any intentional violation of a provision
372 of this article.
373 (c) The commissioner of public safety shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to
374 implement the provisions of this article."
375 SECTION 2.
376 Said title is further amended by revising paragraph (12) of Code Section 40-1-100, relating
377 to definitions relative to certification of motor carriers, as follows:
378 "(12) 'Motor carrier' means:
379 (A) Every person owning, controlling, operating, or managing any motor vehicle,
380 including the lessees, receivers, or trustees of such persons or receivers appointed by
381 any court, used in the business of transporting for hire persons, household goods, or
382 property or engaged in the activity of nonconsensual towing pursuant to Code
383 Section 44-1-13 for hire over any public highway in this state or providing towing
384 services as provided for in Article 3 of Chapter 11 of this title.
385 (B) Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, the term 'motor carrier' shall
386 not include:
387 (i) Motor vehicles engaged solely in transporting school children and teachers to and
388 from public schools and private schools;
389 (ii) Taxicabs which operate within the corporate limits of municipalities and are
390 subject to regulation by the governing authorities of such municipalities; the
391 provisions of this division notwithstanding, vehicles and the drivers thereof operating
392 within the corporate limits of any city shall be subject to the safety regulations
393 adopted by the commissioner of public safety pursuant to Code Section 40-1-8;
394 (iii) Limousine carriers as provided for in Part 3 of this article;
395 (iv) Hotel passenger or baggage motor vehicles when used exclusively for patrons
396 and employees of such hotel;
H. B. 184
- 16 -

25 LC 52 0652
397 (v) Motor vehicles operated not for profit with a capacity of 15 persons or less when
398 they are used exclusively to transport elderly and disabled passengers or employees
399 under a corporate sponsored vanpool program, except that a vehicle owned by the
400 driver may be operated for profit when such driver is traveling to and from his or her
401 place of work, provided each such vehicle carrying more than nine passengers
402 maintains liability insurance in an amount of not less than $100,000.00 per person
403 and $300,000.00 per accident and $50,000.00 property damage. For the purposes of
404 this part, elderly and disabled passengers are defined as individuals over the age of 60
405 years or who, by reason of illness, injury, age, congenital malfunction, or other
406 permanent or temporary incapacity or disability, are unable to utilize mass
407 transportation facilities as effectively as persons who are not so affected;
408 (vi) Motor vehicles owned and operated exclusively by the United States government
409 or by this state or any subdivision thereof;
410 (vii) Vehicles, owned or operated by the federal or state government or by any
411 agency, instrumentality, or political subdivision of the federal or state government,
412 or privately owned and operated for profit or not for profit, capable of transporting not
413 more than ten persons for hire when such vehicles are used exclusively to transport
414 persons who are elderly, disabled, en route to receive medical care or prescription
415 medication, or returning after receiving medical care or prescription medication. For
416 the purpose of this part, elderly and disabled persons shall have the same meaning as
417 in division (v) of this subparagraph; or
418 (viii) Ambulances."
419 SECTION 3.
420 Said title is further amended by revising Code Section 40-1-130, relating to inclusion of
421 motor carrier authorization number in advertising, as follows:
H. B. 184
- 17 -

25 LC 52 0652
422 "40-1-130.
423 In any advertisement for a motor carrier, whether by print, radio, television, other
424 broadcast, or electronic media including but not limited to Internet internet advertising and
425 any listing or sites on any website, the motor carrier shall include the motor carrier
426 authorization number issued to it by the Department of Public Safety. The requirements
427 of this Code section shall not apply to nonconsensual towing motor carriers providing
428 services pursuant to Code Section 44-1-13 or to towing companies providing towing
429 services pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 11 of this title. The department shall be required
430 to issue a motor carrier authorization number to each registered motor carrier. Whenever
431 the department, after a hearing conducted in accordance with the provisions of Code
432 Section 40-1-56, finds that any person is advertising in violation of this Code section, the
433 department may impose a fine of not more than $500.00 for an initial violation and not
434 more than $15,000.00 for a second or subsequent violation."
435 SECTION 4.
436 Said title is further amended by revising subsection (g) of Code Section 40-6-226, relating
437 to offenses and penalties relative to parking for persons with disabilities, as follows:
438 "(g) In addition to the penalties provided for in subsection (f) of this Code section, any
439 vehicle which is illegally parked in a parking place for persons with disabilities which is
440 marked by a sign bearing the words 'Tow-Away Zone' as described in paragraph (3) of
441 Code Section 40-6-221 on public or private property may be towed away or caused to be
442 towed away by a proper law enforcement agency or the official security agency of said
443 property at the expense of the owner of the vehicle or, if the vehicle is leased or rented, at
444 the expense of the person responsible for payment on the lease or rental agreement,
445 provided that the towing company and storage facility comply with the provisions of
446 Article 3 of Chapter 11 of this title."
H. B. 184
- 18 -

25 LC 52 0652
447 SECTION 5.
448 Title 44 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to property, is amended by
449 revising subsections (a.1) and (c) of Code Section 44-1-13, relating to removal of improperly
450 parked cars or trespassing personal property, concurrent jurisdiction, procedure, automatic
451 surveillance prohibited, and penalty, as follows:
452 "(a.1) Any person or his or her authorized agent entitled to the possession of any private
453 property shall have the right to remove or cause to be removed from the property any
454 vehicle or trespassing personal property thereon which is not authorized to be at the place
455 where it is found and to store or cause to be stored such vehicle or trespassing personal
456 property, provided that there shall have been conspicuously posted on the private property
457 notice that any vehicle or trespassing personal property which is not authorized to be at the
458 place where it is found may be removed at the expense of the owner of the vehicle or
459 trespassing personal property. Such notice shall also include information as to the location
460 where the vehicle or personal property can be recovered, the cost of said recovery, and
461 information as to the form of payment; provided, however, that the owner of residential
462 private property containing not more than four residential units shall not be required to
463 comply with the posting requirements of this subsection. Only towing and storage firms
464 issued permits or licenses by the local governing authority of the jurisdiction in which they
465 operate or by the department, and having a secure impoundment facility, shall be permitted
466 to remove trespassing property and trespassing personal property at the request of the
467 owner or authorized agent of the private property. Towing companies and storage facilities
468 providing towing services and related storage services from private property shall comply
469 with the requirements provided for in Article 3 of Chapter 11 of Title 40."
470 "(c) In all municipalities, except a consolidated city-county government, having a
471 population of 100,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1970 or
472 any future such census a person entitled to the possession of an off-street parking area or
473 vacant lot within an area zoned commercial by the municipality shall have the right to
H. B. 184
- 19 -

25 LC 52 0652
474 remove any vehicle or trespassing personal property parked thereon after the regular
475 activity on such property is concluded for the day only if access to such property from the
476 public way is blocked by a sturdy chain, cable, or rope stretched at least 18 inches above
477 grade across all driveways or other ways providing access to the off-street parking area or
478 vacant lot and there is conspicuously posted in the area a notice, the location of which must
479 be approved by the municipality's police department, that any vehicle or trespassing
480 personal property parked thereon which is not authorized to be in such area may be
481 removed at the expense of the owner along with information as to where the vehicle or
482 trespassing personal property may be recovered, the cost of said recovery, and information
483 regarding the form of payment. Towing companies and storage facilities providing towing
484 services and related storage services for a municipality shall comply with the requirements
485 provided for in Article 3 of Chapter 11 of Title 40."
486 SECTION 6.
487 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
488 without such approval.
489 SECTION 7.
490 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 184
- 20 -